Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-51,103
Nebraska Emergency Medical System Operations Fund; created; use; investment; Department of Health and Human Services; report.

(1) There is hereby created the Nebraska Emergency Medical System Operations Fund. The fund may receive gifts, bequests, grants, fees, or other contributions or donations from public or private entities.

(2)(a) The fund shall be used to carry out the purposes of the Statewide Trauma System Act and the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act, including:

(i) Activities related to the design, maintenance, or enhancement of the statewide trauma system;

(ii) Support for emergency medical services programs;

(iii) Support for the emergency medical services programs for children;

(iv) Financial support for the statewide patient care reporting system and trauma registry described in section 71-8248; and

(v) Financial support for recruitment, retention, and training emergency care providers.

(b) The Department of Health and Human Services may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this subsection.

(3) The Department of Health and Human Services shall electronically deliver a report to the Clerk of the Legislature by December 31 of each year that includes the following information from the most recent previous fiscal year:

(a) The amount of money appropriated to the Department of Health and Human Services from the Nebraska Emergency Medical System Operations Fund that was not spent and an explanation for why such money was not spent; and

(b) The amount of money appropriated to the Department of Health and Human Services from the Nebraska Emergency Medical System Operations Fund that was spent and an explanation for how such money was spent.

(4) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2001, LB 191, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 606;

Laws 2007, LB463 § 1222;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 119;

Laws 2013, LB222, § 28;

Laws 2024, LB1108, § 2.

Emergency Medical Services Practice Act, see section 38-1201.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.

Statewide Trauma System Act, see section 71-8201.